Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2448.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 204 of the act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971, is amended by adding a clause to read:Section 204. Exclusions from Tax.--The tax imposed by section 202 shall not be imposed upon any of the following:* * * ( 77) The sale at retail or use of bicycles, bicycle parts and bicycle helmets during the exclusion period to an individual purchaser for nonbusiness purposes. The department shall publish 12345678910111213141516171819202122 a notice on its publicly accessible Internet website to give guidance on the implementation of the exclusion under this clause. For the purposes of this clause: (i) "Bicycle" means a vehicle composed of two wheels held in a frame one behind the other, propelled by pedals and steered with handlebars attached to the front wheel. The term includes handicap and adaptive bicycles as well as Class one, two and three e-bicycles.(ii) "Bicycle parts" means tires, chains, gears or any other part needed to maintain the operation of a bicycle.(iii) "Exclusion period" means the six months immediately following the effective date of this clause.(iv) "Purchaser" means an individual who places an order and pays the purchase price by cash or credit during the exclusion period even if delivery takes place after the exclusion period. Section 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026, or immediately, whichever is later.20260HB2448PN3261 - 2 - 1234567891011121314151617